District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

38-1851.01

Purpose.

Repealed.

Jan. 23, 2004, 118 Stat. 127, Pub. L. 108-199, § 303
Apr. 15, 2011, 125 Stat. 209, Pub. L. 112-10, § 3012(a)
Short title: Section 301 of Pub. L. 108-199 provided that: “This title may be cited as the ‘D.C. School Choice Incentive Act of 2003.”’